Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
ADMINISTRATION

Law Journals and Reviews

One-Sided Bargain? Assessing the Fairness of Hawai‘i's
Workers' Compensation Law. 31 UH L. Rev. 553 (2009).

§386-71 Duties and powers of the director
in general. The director of labor and industrial relations shall be in
charge of all matters of administration pertaining to the operation and
application of this chapter. The director shall have and exercise all powers
necessary to facilitate or promote the efficient execution of this chapter and,
in particular, shall supervise, and take all measures necessary for, the prompt
and proper payment of compensation.

If an injury which may be compensable under
this chapter is reported to, or comes to the notice of, the department of labor
and industrial relations, the director and the director's staff shall
investigate such injury to the extent as may appear necessary. The director
shall cause to be printed and furnished free of charge to any employer or
employee such blank forms as the director deems requisite to the performance of
the director's functions. The blanks shall also be supplied by the director to
the clerks of the respective circuit courts, who shall furnish the same to any
employer or employee free of charge pursuant to any rules issued by the
director. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-70; HRS §386-71; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 43 H. 173, 180 (1959).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next